Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.160

Governor's authority to suspend certain minimum renewable fuel content requirements.

The governor, by executive order, may suspend all or portions of the minimum renewable fuel content requirements in RCW 19.112.110 or 19.112.120, or 43.19.642, based on a determination that such requirements are temporarily technically or economically infeasible, or pose a significant risk to public safety.

[ 2006 c 338 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.